West Virginia, session 2026, SB198.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. WILDLIFE RESOURCES. §20-2-63. Waiver of fees for municipal volunteer firefighters applying for hunting, trapping, and fishing licenses. (a) For any person who serves as a municipal volunteer firefighter who would otherwise be required to have a license or permit to hunt, fish, or trap, the fee to obtain the license or permit that would otherwise be required by the director by legislative rules issued pursuant to §20-2-42 of this code is waived. (b) To be eligible for this fee waiver, a person applying for a license or permit must submit an affidavit signed by the applicant's fire chief, stating that the applicant is a volunteer firefighter. (c) Any person seeking a fee waiver must provide all other information required by the director for issuance of the license and must comply with all other provisions of law relating to the applicable license or permit that is sought. (d) The director may propose rules for legislative approval in accordance with the provisions of §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code setting forth application and processing procedures.